Utah statutes.
41-1a-404.   Location and position of plates.

(1)  License plates issued for a vehicle other than a motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer shall be attached to the vehicle, one in the front and the other in the rear.

(2)  The license plate issued for a motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer shall be attached to the rear of the motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer.

(3)  Every license plate shall at all times be:

(a)  securely fastened:

(i)  in a horizontal position to the vehicle for which it is issued to prevent the plate from swinging;

(ii)  at a height of not less than 12 inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of the plate; and

(iii)  in a place and position to be clearly visible; and

(b)  maintained:

(i)  free from foreign materials; and

(ii)  in a condition to be clearly legible.

(4)  Enforcement by a state or local law enforcement officer of the requirement under Subsection (1) to attach a license plate to the front of a vehicle shall be only as a secondary action when the vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation by any person in the vehicle of Title 41, Motor Vehicles, other than the requirement under Subsection (1) to attach a license plate to the front of the vehicle, or for another offense.

